en: Tuna chunks
bg: Парченца риба тон
de: Thunfisch Stücke
fi: tonnikalaa paloina
fr: Miettes de thon
hr: komadiće tune
it: Tranci di tonno
nl: Tonijnstukjes

fr: filets de thon
de: Thunfisch Filets
fi: tonnikalafilee

en: tuna steak
de: Thunfischsteak, Thunfischsteaks, Thunfisch-Steak, Thunfisch-Steaks
es: lomos de atun
hr: odrezak od tune
it: filetto di tonno

en: precooked tuna
de: gegarter Thunfisch, Thunfisch gegart
fr: thon précuit, thon précuit haché
hr: kuhano meso tune
it: tonno precotto

fr: Ventrèches de thon
it: ventresca di tonno

en: albacore, albacore tuna, white tuna, solid white tuna
af: Albakoor
ar: تونة بيضاء
az: Uzunüzgəc tunes
bg: дългопера риба тон, бял тон
br: Toun gwenn
ca: bacora
cs: tuňák křídlatý
cy: Tiwna Asgell-Hir
de: Weisse Thunfisch, Weißer Thun, Weißer-Thun
el: Μακρυπτέρυγος τόνος
es: atún blanco, albacora, bonito del norte
eu: Atun hegaluze
fa: تون باله‌دراز
fi: Valkotonnikala
fr: thon blanc, thon blanc germon
gl: Bonito do norte
he: אלבקור
hr: albacore
id: Albakora
is: Hvíti túnfiskur
it: tonno bianco
ja: ビンナガ
ko: 날개다랑어
la: Thunnus alalonga
nb: Albakor
nl: Witte tonijn
pl: Tuńczyk albakora
sl: Beli tun
sv: Långfenad tonfisk
th: ปลาทูน่าครีบยาว
tr: Beyaz ton balığı
zh: 长鳍金枪鱼

en: skipjack tuna, skip jack tuna
xx: Katsuwonus pelamis, Euthynnus palamis, Euthynnus, katsuwonus
af: Pensstreep-tuna
ar: تونة وثابة
bg: ивичест тунец
ca: bonítol ratllat
cs: tuňák pruhovaný
cy: Marlin
de: Echter Bonito
dv: ކަޅުބިލަ މަސް
eo: Vera bonito
es: Bonito de altura, listado
eu: Lanpo sabelmarradun
fa: هوور مسقطی
fi: Boniitti
fr: thon listao, bonite à ventre rayé, Thon rose, Thon rosé
ga: Boiníotó aigéanach
gl: Atún listado
he: אטונס שחור קווים
hr: prugasta tuna, katsuwonus pelamis, tuna prugasta
hu: Csíkoshasú tonhal
id: Cakalang
is: Randatúnfiskur
it: Tonnetto striato
ja: カツオ, かつお
jv: Iwak Cakalang
la: Katsuwonus pelamis, Euthynnus palamis, Euthynnus, katsuwonus
ms: Ikan Aya
nb: Bukstripet bonitt
nl: gestreepte tonijn
pl: Bonito
pt: bonito
ro: ton dungat
ru: Полосатый тунец
si: බලයා
sl: Črtasti tun
su: Cakalang
sv: Skipjack-tonfisk, Bonit
th: ปลาโอแถบ
tr: Yazılı orkinos
uk: Тунець смугастий
vi: Cá ngừ vằn
zh: 鲣

en: skipjack tuna fillet
hr: fileti tune prugaste
it: filetto di tonno striato

en: Katsuobushi, bonito flakes
ar: كاتسوؤبوشي
ca: Katsuobushi
da: Katsuobushi
de: Katsuobushi
es: Katsuobushi
fi: Katsuobushi
fr: Katsuobushi
hr: katsuobushi
id: Katsuobushi
is: Katsuobushi
it: Katsuobushi
ja: 鰹節, カツオ節, かつお節
jv: Katsuobushi
ko: 가쓰오부시
ms: Katsuobushi
nl: Katsuobushi
pt: Katsuobushi
ru: Кацуобуси
sv: Katsuobushi
th: คัตสึโอบูชิ
tr: Katsuobushi
uk: Кацуобусі
vi: Katsuobushi
zh: 鰹魚乾

en: yellowfin tuna
af: Geelvintuna
ar: تونة الزعنفة الصفراء
az: Sarıüzgəc tunes
bg: жълтопера риба тон
ca: tonyina clara, tonyina d'aleta groga
cs: tuňák žlutoploutvý
de: Gelbflossen-Thun
dv: ރީނދޫ އުރަހަ ކަންނެލި
es: atún claro, atún de aleta amarilla
eu: Atun hegats-hori
fa: گیدر
fi: Keltaevätonnikala
fr: thon albacore, Thon jaune
gl: Atún de aleta amarela
hr: thunnus albacares
hu: Sárgaúszójú tonhal
it: Tonno a pinna gialla, tonno pinna gialla, tonno a pinne gialle
ja: キハダマグロ
la: Thunnus albacares
nl: Geelvintonijn
pt: atum albacora
ru: желтопёрый тунец
sl: Rumenoplavuti tun
sv: Gulfenad tonfisk

en: bigeye tuna
de: Großaugenthun
hr: velikooka tuna
it: tonno obeso
la: Thunnus obesus

en: grenadier
da: Hoki
de: Hoki
eo: Hokio
fi: Hoki
fr: Hoki
hr: grenadir
it: granatiere
nl: Hoki
sv: Hoki

en: blue grenadier
ca: lluç de cua afuada neozelandès
cs: treskovník novozélandský
de: Blauer Seehecht
es: Merluza neozelandesa
fa: ماهی هوکی
fr: Hoki de Nouvelle-Zélande, Grenadier bleu, Merlu à longue queue
hr: plavi grenadir
it: nasello azzurro
ja: ホキ
la: Macruronus novaezelandiae, macruronus spp
pl: Miruna
ru: Новозеландский макруронус
zh: 藍尖尾無鬚鱈

en: Patagonian grenadier
bg: патагонски гренадир
de: Patagonischer Grenadier (Fisch)
es: merluza de cola
fi: patagonianhoki
fr: grenadier patagonien, merluche patagonienne, Hoku argentin
hr: patagonijski grenadir
it: nasello patagonico, merluzzo patagonico
la: Macruronus magellanicus
nl: Patagonische grenadier
sv: Chilensk hoki
zh: 南美尖尾無鬚鱈

en: roundnose grenadier
fr: Grenadier de roche
it: granatiere a naso tondo

en: ling
fr: lingue, julienne
hr: vrijesak
la: Molva

en: common ling
la: Molva molva

en: blue ling
fr: lingue bleue
it: molva blu
la: Molva dypterygia

en: lingcod
la: Ophiodon elongatus

en: mackerel
ar: الإسقمري
bg: скумрия, риба скумрия
br: Brezhell
ca: Verat
cy: Macrell
da: Makrel
de: Makrele
el: Σκουμπρί
es: Verdel, caballa, caballa del sur
et: Makrell
eu: Berdel
fi: Makrilli
fr: maquereau, maquereaux
ga: Ronnach
gd: Rionnach
gl: Xarda
hr: skuša
ht: Makro
hu: makréla
io: Makrelo
is: Makríll
it: Sgombro, sgombri, scombro
ja: サバ, さば, 鯖
ka: სკუმბრია
kk: Скумбрия
la: Scomber
lv: Makrele
mk: Скуша
mr: बांगडा
nb: Makrell
nl: makreel
nn: Makrell
no: Makrell
oc: Vairat
pl: makrela, makreli, makrele, makrelowa, makrelowe, makrelowy
pt: Cavala
ro: Scrumbie
ru: Скумбрия
sk: Skuša
sl: Skuša
sr: Скуша
sv: Makrill
tr: Uskumru
zh: 鯖魚